Arkansas, session 2025, SB263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-26-1118(a)(1)(A), concerning the
homestead property tax credit, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) There is established a homestead property tax credit for
each assessment year that reduces the amount of real property taxes assessed
on the homestead of each property owner by five hundred dollars ($500) six
hundred dollars ($600).

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for
*JLL213*
02-27-2025 13:06:49 JLL213

As Engrossed: S2/27/25 SB263
assessment years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

/s/Crowell

































02-27-2025 13:06:49 JLL213